District of Columbia statutes.
28:7-509

Adequate compliance with commercial contract.

Whether a document of title is adequate to fulfill the obligations of a contract for sale, a contract for lease, or the conditions of a letter of credit is determined by Article 2, 2A, or 5.

History

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 730, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-299, § 9, 60 DCR 2634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:7-509.
1973 Ed., § 28:7-509.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Prior Uniform Statutory Provision: None.

Purposes: To cross-refer to the Articles of this Act which deal with the substantive issues of the type of document of title required under the contract entered into by the parties.

Cross References: Articles 2 and 5.

Definitional Cross References: “Contract for sale”. Section 2-106.

“Document”. Section 7-102.

Prior Uniform Statutory Provision: Former Section 7-509.

Changes: To reference Article 2A.

Purposes: To cross-refer to the Articles of this Act which deal with the substantive issues of the type of document of title required under the contract entered into by the parties.

Cross References: Articles 2, 2A and 5.

Definitional Cross References: “Contract for sale”. Section 2-106.

“Document of title”. Section 1-201.

“Lease”. Section 2A-103.

Part 6.

Warehouse Receipts and Bills of Lading: Miscellaneous Provisions.